Idaho statutes. Title 38 FORESTRY, FOREST PRODUCTS AND STUMPAGE DISTRICTS
Chapter 10
STUMPAGE DISTRICTS

Sec.

§ 38-1001. Corporate powers of stumpage districts. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1002. Petition for organization. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1003. Bond for costs if district not established. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1004. Notice of hearing. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1005. Hearing and order. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1006. Appointment of stumpage commissioners

Organization of board. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1007. Officers

Meetings. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1008. Vacancies. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1009. Compensation of commissioners. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1010. Preliminary survey. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1011. Duties of prosecuting attorney. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1012. Report of intention to do work

Notice of hearing. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1013. Order of confirmation

Assessment of benefits. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1014. Assessments entered as tax liens

Installments. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1015. Appeals from assessments. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1016. Clearing of lands

Executive powers of board. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1017. Contract for clearing

Contractor’s bonds. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1018. Payment to contractors. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1019. Warrants. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1020. Payment of warrants

Interest. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1021. Bonds authorized. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1022. Refunding bonds. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1023. Form of bonds

Interest. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1024. Levy for sinking fund. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1025. Payment of bonds. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1026. Levy for interest. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 38-1027. Registration of bonds. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2014, ch. 234, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.